Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Article 2. Protection of Sound Productions

§ 40-13-201.
Definitions.

As used in W.S.

40-13-201

through

40-13-206

:

“Owner” means the person who owns the original fixation of sounds embodied in the master phonograph record, master disc, master tape, master film or other device used for reproducing sounds on phonograph records, discs, tapes, films or other articles upon which sound is recorded and from which the transferred recorded sounds are directly derived;

“Performer” means any person appearing in a performance.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 35, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Scope of exclusive rights in sound recordings under § 144(b) of Copyright Act of 1976 (17 USC § 114(b)) 151 ALR Fed 433.

§ 40-13-202.
Prohibited acts.

No person shall:

Knowingly and without the consent of the owner, transfer or cause to be transferred any sounds recorded on a phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film or other article on which sounds are recorded, with intent to sell or to cause to be sold for profit or used to promote the sale of any product, the article on which the sounds are transferred; or

Knowingly and without the consent of the performer or his agent, transfer to or cause to be transferred to any phonograph record, disc, wire, tape, film or other article, any performance, whether live before an audience or transmitted by wire or through the air by radio or television, with intent to sell or to cause to be sold for profit or used to promote the sale of any product, the article on which the performance is transferred.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 35, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Scope of exclusive rights in sound recordings under § 144(b) of Copyright Act of 1976 (17 USC § 114(b)) 151 ALR Fed 433.

§ 40-13-203.
Forfeiture and destruction.

Any article produced in violation of W.S.

40-13-202

and any equipment or components used in producing the article is subject to forfeiture to and destruction by law enforcement agencies.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 35, § 1.

§ 40-13-204.
Additional prohibited act; evidence.

No person shall knowingly or with reasonable grounds to know, advertise, offer for sale or resale, sell or resell, distribute or possess any article which has been produced without the consent of the owner or performer. Possession of five (5) or more duplicate copies or twenty (20) or more individual copies of recorded articles produced without the consent of the owner or performer is prima facie evidence that the devices are intended for sale or distribution in violation of this section.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 35, § 1.

§ 40-13-205.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any portion of W.S.

40-13-202

is guilty of a felony and shall be imprisoned in the state penitentiary for not less than one (1) year nor more than two (2) years or fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both. Each violation is a separate offense.

Any person who violates the provisions of W.S.

40-13-204

is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be imprisoned in the county jail for not more than one (1) year or fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both. Each violation is a separate offense.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 35, § 1.

§ 40-13-206.
Exceptions.

W.S.

40-13-201

through

40-13-206

do not apply to:

Any broadcaster who, in connection with or as part of a radio, television or cable broadcast transmission or for the purpose of archival preservation, transfers any such sounds recorded on a sound recording;

Any person who transfers such sounds in the home, for personal use and without compensation for the transfer;

The transfer of sounds or possession of duplicate copies within an educational institution, solely for educational purposes; or

Any common carrier whose services or facilities are merely contracted for and used by another for the purpose of transferring sound.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 35, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

added “or” at the end of (a)(iii); and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Severability. —

Laws 1978, ch. 35, § 2, provides: “If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Scope of exclusive rights in sound recordings under § 144(b) of Copyright Act of 1976 (17 USC § 114(b)) 151 ALR Fed 433.